Hawaii statutes.
§46-22 Compensation of certain county
officials. Any law to the contrary notwithstanding, each county, including
the city and county of Honolulu, by ordinance shall fix the salaries for its
officials whose salaries are presently specifically established by statute or
ordinance. [L 1965, c 223, §10; Supp, §138-5.5; HRS §46-22]

Case Notes

Includes power to amend Honolulu Charter. 50 H. 277, 439
P.2d 206.

Constitutionality of state law prohibiting salary increases
of certain county officers and employees upheld. 67 H. 412, 689 P.2d 757.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next